Hawaii, session 2025, GM1161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 432:1-407, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (g) to read as follows:
"(g) Each domestic mutual benefit society shall prepare
and submit for review by the commissioner on or before the
forty-fifth day [ef-] after each [quarto^-,- ] of the first three
calendar quarters, and for the fourth calendar quarter ending
December 31, on or before the next March 1, a copy of its
quarterly net solvency report verified by at least two principal
officers. The commissioner may prescribe the forms on which the
reports are to be prepared. Each domestic mutual benefit
society shall maintain a copy of its current net solvency report
on the premises of its primary place of business. The
commissioner may order an examination, subject to article 2 of
chapter 431, to determine whether a domestic mutual benefit
society is in compliance with this section. Any domestic mutual
benefit society that fails or refuses to prepare or [pteduee]
submit for review the quarterly net solvency report as required
2025-2955 SB1369 HDl HMSO

Page 2
S.B. NO.
3-1
H.D. 1
by this subsection shall be liable for a penalty in an amount
[net] no less than $100 and [not] more than $500 per day."
SECTION 2. Section 432D-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (g) to read as follows:
"(g) Each health maintenance organization shall prepare
and submit for review by the commissioner on or before the
forty-fifth day [ef] after each [quarter,] of the first three
calendar quarters, and for the fourth calendar quarter ending
December 31, on or before the next March 1, a copy of its
quarterly net solvency report verified by at least two principal
officers. The commissioner may prescribe the forms on which the
reports are to be prepared. Every health maintenance
organization shall maintain a copy of its current net solvency
report on the premises of its primary place of business. The
commissioner may order an examination, subject to article 2 of
chapter 431, to determine whether a health maintenance
organization is in compliance with this section. Any health
maintenance organization that fails or refuses to prepare or
[produce] submit for review the quarterly net solvency report as
required by this subsection shall be liable for a penalty in an
2025-2955 SB1369 HDl HMSO

Page 3
S.B. NO. S';
amount [ftet] less than $100 and [ftet] no more than $500 per
day."
SECTION 3. Section 432G-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (g) and (h) to read as follows:
"(g) Each dental insurer shall prepare and submit for
review by the commissioner on or before the forty-fifth day [e^]
after each [quarter,] of the first three calendar quarters, and
for the fourth calendar quarter ending December 31, on or before
the next March 1, a copy of its quarterly net solvency report
verified by at least two principal officers. The commissioner
may prescribe the forms on which the reports are to be prepared.
Every dental insurer shall maintain a copy of its current net
solvency report on the premises of its primary place of
business.
(h) The commissioner may order an examination, subject to
article 2 of chapter 431, to determine whether a dental insurer
is in compliance with this section. Any dental insurer that
fails or refuses to prepare or [produce] submit for review the
quarterly net solvency report or any of the documents as
required by this section shall be liable for a penalty pursuant
to section 432G-4(c)."
2025-2955 SB1369 HDl HMSO
miiiiHiiiiiinoniiii

Page 4
S.B. NO.
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on October 1, 2025.
2025-2955 SB1369 HDl HMSO

S.B. NO.
s"
H.D. 1
APPROVED this 16th day o1 May , 2025

S B. No. 1369, S.D. 1,H.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 23, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 1369, SD 1,HD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE
STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 3, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives